src/morphology/roots/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON PRON
[WORD_ID=aina][POS=PROADVERB][SUBCAT=QUANTOR]:aina  ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=erilainen][POS=PROADJECTIVE]:erilai  A_AAKKOSELLINEN ;
[WORD_ID=eri][POS=PRONOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:erit      PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=eri][POS=PRONOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:eri      PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=eräs][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:eräittä     PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=eräs][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:eräiltä     PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=eräs][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:eräillä     PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=eräs][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:eräille     PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=eräs][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=CMT]:eräine      PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=eräs][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:eräistä     PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=eräs][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:eräinä      PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=eräs][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:eräiden     PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=eräs][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:eräisiin    PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=eräs][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:eräissä     PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=eräs][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=INS]:eräin   PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=eräs][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:eräät   PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=eräs][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:eräitä      PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=eräs][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:eräiksi     PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=eräs][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:eräättä     PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=eräs][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:eräältä     PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=eräs][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:eräällä     PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=eräs][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:eräälle     PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=eräs][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:eräästä     PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=eräs][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:eräänä      PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=eräs][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:erään   PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=eräs][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:erääseen    PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=eräs][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:eräässä     PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=eräs][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=INS]:erään   PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=eräs][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:eräs    PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=eräs][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:erästä      PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=eräs][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:erääksi     PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=harva][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:harvoitta   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=harva][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:harvoilta   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=harva][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:harvoilla   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=harva][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:harvoille   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=harva][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=CMT]:harvoine    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=harva][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:harvoista   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=harva][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:harvoina    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=harva][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:harvojen    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=harva][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:harvoihin   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=harva][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:harvoissa   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=harva][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=INS]:harvoin     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=harva][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:harvat  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=harva][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:harvoja     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=harva][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:harvoiksi   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=harva][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:harvatta    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=harva][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:harvalta    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=harva][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:harvalla    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=harva][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:harvalle    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=harva][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:harvasta    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=harva][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:harvana     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=harva][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:harvan  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=harva][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:harvaan     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=harva][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:harvassa    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=harva][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=INS]:harvan  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=harva][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:harva   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=harva][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:harvaa  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=harva][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:harvaksi    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=harvasti][POS=PROADVERB][SUBCAT=QUANTOR]:harvasti  ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=harvoin][POS=PROADVERB][SUBCAT=QUANTOR]:harvoin  ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=heitti][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=PL][CASE=ABL][STYLE=DIALECT]:heittiltä    PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=heitti][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE][STYLE=DIALECT]:heittillä    PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=heitti][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL][STYLE=DIALECT]:heittille    PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=heitti][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA][STYLE=DIALECT]:heittissä    PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=heitti][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=PL][CASE=ESS][STYLE=DIALECT]:heittinä    PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=heitti][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN][STYLE=DIALECT]:heittin    PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=heitti][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=PL][CASE=ILL][STYLE=DIALECT]:heittiin    PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=heitti][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=PL][CASE=INE][STYLE=DIALECT]:heittissä    PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=heitti][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM][STYLE=DIALECT]:heitti    PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=heitti][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR][STYLE=DIALECT]:heittiä    PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=he][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:heittä    PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=he][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:heiltä    PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=he][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=PL][CASE=ACC]:heidät    PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=he][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:heillä    PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=he][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:heille    PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=he][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:heistä    PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=he][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:heinä     PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=he][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:heidän    PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=he][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:heihin    PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=he][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:heissä    PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=he][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=PL][CASE=INS]:hein      PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=he][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:he    PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=he][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:heitä     PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=he][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:heiksi    PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=hiä][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM][STYLE=DIALECT]:hiä     PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=hyö][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=PL][CASE=ACC][STYLE=DIALECT]:heiät      PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=hyö][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN][STYLE=DIALECT]:heiän      PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=hyö][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM][STYLE=DIALECT]:hyö    PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=hän][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:hänettä      PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=hän][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:häneltä      PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=hän][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=SG][CASE=ACC]:hänet    PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=hän][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:hänellä      PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=hän][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:hänelle      PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=hän][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:hänestä      PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=hän][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:hänenä   PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=hän][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:hänen    PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=hän][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:häneen   PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=hän][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:hänessä      PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=hän][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=SG][CASE=INS]:hänen    PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=hän][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:hän      PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=hän][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:häntä    PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=hän][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:häneksi      PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=hää][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=SG][CASE=ABL][STYLE=DIALECT]:hältä      PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=hää][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE][STYLE=DIALECT]:hällä      PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=hää][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=SG][CASE=ALL][STYLE=DIALECT]:hälle      PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=hää][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=SG][CASE=ILL][STYLE=DIALECT]:hännee     PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=hää][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=PERSONAL][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM][STYLE=DIALECT]:hää    PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=itse][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=REFLEXIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ABL][STYLE=DIALECT]:iteiltä  PRON_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT    ;
[WORD_ID=itse][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=REFLEXIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ABL][STYLE=DIALECT]:iteiltä  PRON_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT    ;
[WORD_ID=itse][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=REFLEXIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:itseillä  PRON_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT    ;
[WORD_ID=itse][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=REFLEXIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE][STYLE=DIALECT]:iteillä  PRON_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT    ;
[WORD_ID=itse][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=REFLEXIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:itseille  PRON_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT    ;
[WORD_ID=itse][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=REFLEXIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL][STYLE=DIALECT]:iteille  PRON_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT    ;
[WORD_ID=itse][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=REFLEXIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=CMT]:itseine  PRON_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT    ;
[WORD_ID=itse][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=REFLEXIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=CMT][STYLE=DIALECT]:itteine  PRON_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT    ;
[WORD_ID=itse][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=REFLEXIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:itseistä  PRON_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT    ;
[WORD_ID=itse][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=REFLEXIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA][STYLE=DIALECT]:iteistä  PRON_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT    ;
[WORD_ID=itse][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=REFLEXIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:itseinä  PRON_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT    ;
[WORD_ID=itse][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=REFLEXIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ESS][STYLE=DIALECT]:itteinä  PRON_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT    ;
[WORD_ID=itse][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=REFLEXIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:itsee  PRON_FRONT_POSS  ;
[WORD_ID=itse][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=REFLEXIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:itse  PRON_FRONT_POSS_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=itse][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=REFLEXIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN][STYLE=DIALECT]:ite  PRON_FRONT_POSS_OPT  ;
